Connecticut, session 2026, SB00266.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10-512d of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Commissioner of Early Childhood may expend, in
accordance with the provisions of section 10-512c, funds released by the
Treasurer from the Early Childhood Education Endowment, pursuant
to section 10-512b, to any early care and education program providing
child care services, as described in section 19a-77, or preschool program
operated by a local or regional board of education that is (1) receiving
financial assistance under Early Start CT pursuant to section 10-550b, (2)
participating in the quality improvement system established by the
Office of Early Childhood under subdivision (15) of subsection (b) of
section 10-500, and (3) participating in the Child and Adult Care Food
Program, 42 USC 1766, as amended from time to time, unless such
program has received a waiver from participation in said program by
the Commissioner of Early Childhood or is a public school preschool
program that offers free or reduced priced lunches pursuant to federal
law and regulations, except the commissioner may not expend such
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 266
funds to any private equity entity until such funds have been expended
to all other such early care and education programs and preschool
programs. As used in this section "private equity entity" means an
individual or publicly traded or nonpublicly traded company that (A)
collects capital investments from individuals or entities; and (B)
purchases a direct or indirect ownership share of an early care and
education program described in this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-512d
KID Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2